test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-salja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Proper Noun - Heimonnimet - Салья: # Noun  Салья 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:  Салья
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: "~?"
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: "~?"
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Abl: "~?"
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Dat: "~?"
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Ins: "~?"
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Abe: "~?"
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Advl: "~?"
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Ine: [Сальялан, Сальяын]
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Сальяла, Сальяе]
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Ela: [Сальялась, Сальяысь]
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Egr: [Сальяласен, Сальяысен]
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Ter: Сальяозь
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Prl: Сальятӥ
     Салья+N+Prop+Sg+Apr: Сальялань
